District of Columbia statutes.
43-104

Inclosure and ornamentation of land; purchase of equipment.

Such association shall have power to inclose and ornament their burial ground, to build and erect a hearse house, and keep the same in proper repair; to purchase a hearse or hearses, and to do all other necessary acts to the end that all the appliances, conveniences, and benefits of a public and private cemetery may be obtained.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1294, ch. 854, § 661

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 27-104.
1973 Ed., § 27-104.